Nevada, session 83, SB364.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 360 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An owner of a business or a person who intends to locate
or expand a business in this State may apply to the Office of
Economic Development pursuant to this section for a partial
abatement of one or more of:
(a) The property taxes imposed on personal property used to
construct, operate, manufacture, reconstruct, maintain, repair or
lay railroad tracks, railroad spurs and other physical
infrastructure in this State necessary to provide rail service or
qualifying railroad real property;
(b) The local sales and use taxes imposed on the purchase of
tangible personal property used to construct, operate,
manufacture, reconstruct, maintain, repair or lay railroad tracks,
railroad spurs and other physical infrastructure in this State
necessary to provide rail service; or
(c) The taxes imposed by chapter 363B of NRS on the wages
paid by an employer to full-time employees who construct, operate,
manufacture, reconstruct, maintain, repair or lay railroad tracks,
railroad spurs and other physical infrastructure in this State
necessary to provide rail service.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of any law to the contrary
and except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the Office of
Economic Development shall approve an application for a partial
abatement if the Office makes the following determinations:
(a) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the
application was received by the Office, the applicant has executed
an agreement with the Office which:
(1) Complies with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) States the date on which the partial abatement becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must
be not earlier than the date on which the Office received the
application and not later than 1 year after the date on which the
Office approves the application;
(3) States that the business will, after the date on which a
certificate of eligibility for the partial abatement is issued pursuant
to subsection 4, continue in operation in this State for a period
specified by the Office, which must be not less than 5 years, and
will continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this
subsection; and
(4) Binds any successor in interest of the applicant for the
specified period;
-
*SB364_R1*

– 4 –
(b) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtaining a valid business license and
all other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates;
(c) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the business
to its employees in this State during the period of partial
abatement is not less than 100 percent of the average statewide
hourly wage as established by the Employment Security Division
of the Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on
July 1 of each fiscal year;
(d) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the partial abatement becomes
effective, offer a health insurance plan for all employees that
includes an option for health insurance coverage for dependents
of the employees, and the health care benefits the business offers
to its employees in this State will meet the minimum requirements
for health care benefits established by the Office;
(e) If the business is:
(1) A new business, it will have 10 or more full-time
employees in this State on the payroll of the business within 1 year
after receiving its certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement;
or
(2) An existing business, it will increase its number of full-
time employees in this State on the payroll of the business by 10
percent or six employees, whichever is greater, within 1 year after
receiving its certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement;
(f) The business meets at least one of the following
requirements:
(1) The business will make a new capital investment of at
least $250,000 in this State within 1 year after receiving its
certificate of eligibility for a partial abatement; and
(2) The business will maintain and possess in this State
tangible personal property having a value of not less than
$5,000,000 during the period of partial abatement; and
(g) If the application is for the partial abatement of the taxes
imposed by the Local School Support Tax Law, the application
has been approved by the vote of at least two-thirds of the
members of the Board of Economic Development created by
NRS 231.033.
3. The Office of Economic Development:
(a) Shall approve or deny an application submitted pursuant to
this section and notify the applicant of its decision not later than
100 days after receiving the application.
(b) Must not:
-
*SB364_R1*

– 5 –
(1) Consider an application for a partial abatement
submitted pursuant to this section unless the Office has requested
a letter of acknowledgment of the request for the partial abatement
from any affected county, school district, city or town and has
complied with the requirements of NRS 360.757; or
(2) Approve a partial abatement for any applicant for a
period of more than 10 years.
4. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
partial abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from property taxes imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the appropriate county treasurer.
5. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section or an existing business whose partial abatement is in effect
shall, upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with
copies of all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets
the requirements of subsection 2.
6. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (a)
of subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the
application was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be
approved for a partial abatement pursuant to this section unless
the applicant submits a new application.
7. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and whose partial abatement is in effect
ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (a) of subsection 2,
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from property taxes, to the appropriate county
treasurer, the amount of the partial abatement that was allowed
pursuant to this section before the failure of the business to
comply, unless the Nevada Tax Commission determines that the
business has substantially complied with the requirements of this
section. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and
360.320, the business shall, in addition to the amount of the
partial abatement required to be repaid pursuant to this
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most
recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or
portion thereof, from the last day of the month following the
-
*SB364_R1*

– 6 –
period for which the payment would have been made had the
partial abatement not been approved until the date of payment of
the tax.
8. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
9. The Nevada Tax Commission may adopt such regulations
as the Commission determines are necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
10. An applicant for a partial abatement who is aggrieved by
a final decision of the Office of Economic Development may
petition a court of competent jurisdiction to review the decision in
the manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Full-time employee” means a person who is in a
permanent position of employment and works an average of 30
hours per week during the applicable period set forth in
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2.
(b) “Local sales and use taxes” means any taxes imposed on
the gross receipts of any retailer from the sale of tangible personal
property sold at retail, or stored, used or otherwise consumed, in
any political subdivision of this State, except the taxes imposed by
the Sales and Use Tax Act.
(c) “Property taxes” means any taxes levied by the State or a
local government pursuant to the provisions of chapter 361 of
NRS.
(d) “Qualifying railroad real property” means real property:
(1) On which railroad tracks or railroad spurs which are
used to provide rail service are located, including the area between
the rails.
(2) Which is adjacent to a railroad track or railroad spur
which is used to provide rail service, up to 1 foot horizontally from
the outside edge of the rails.
Sec. 2. NRS 360.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.225 1. During the course of an investigation undertaken
pursuant to NRS 360.130 of a person claiming:
(a) A partial abatement of property taxes pursuant to
NRS 361.0687;
(b) An exemption from taxes pursuant to NRS 363B.120;
(c) A deferral of the payment of taxes on the sale of eligible
property pursuant to NRS 372.397 or 374.402;
(d) An abatement of taxes on the gross receipts from the sale,
storage, use or other consumption of eligible machinery or
equipment pursuant to NRS 374.357;
-
*SB364_R1*

– 7 –
(e) A partial abatement of taxes pursuant to NRS 360.754 on or
before December 31, 2056;
(f) A partial abatement of taxes pursuant to section 1 of this
act on or before June 30, 2045;
(g) A partial abatement of taxes pursuant to NRS 360.890 on or
before June 30, 2032; or
[(g)] (h) An abatement of taxes pursuant to NRS 360.950 on or
before June 30, 2036,
 the Department shall investigate whether the person meets the
eligibility requirements for the abatement, partial abatement,
exemption or deferral that the person is claiming.
2. If the Department finds that the person does not meet the
eligibility requirements for the abatement, exemption or deferral
which the person is claiming, the Department shall report its
findings to the Office of Economic Development and take any other
necessary actions.
Sec. 3. NRS 360.755 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.755 1. If the Office of Economic Development approves
an application by a business for an abatement of taxes pursuant to
NRS 360.950 or a partial abatement pursuant to NRS 360.750,
360.753, 360.754 or 360.890, or section 1 of this act, the agreement
with the Office must provide that the business:
(a) Agrees to allow the Department to conduct audits of the
business to determine whether the business is in full compliance
with the requirements for the abatement or partial abatement; and
(b) Consents to the disclosure of the audit reports in the manner
set forth in this section.
2. If the Department conducts an audit of the business to
determine whether the business is in full compliance with the
requirements for the abatement or partial abatement, the Department
shall, upon request, provide the audit report to the Office of
Economic Development.
3. Until the business has exhausted all appeals to the
Department and the Nevada Tax Commission relating to the audit,
the information contained in the audit report provided to the Office
of Economic Development:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record; and
(c) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or
employee of the Office of Economic Development unless the
business consents to the disclosure.
4. After the business has exhausted all appeals to the
Department and the Nevada Tax Commission relating to the audit:
(a) The audit report provided to the Office of Economic
Development is a public record; and
-
*SB364_R1*

– 8 –
(b) Upon request by any person, the Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development shall disclose the audit report to
the person who made the request, except for any information in the
audit report that is protected from disclosure pursuant to
subsection 5.
5. Before the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development discloses the audit report to the public, the business
may submit a request to the Executive Director to protect from
disclosure any information in the audit report which, under
generally accepted business practices, would be considered a trade
secret or other confidential proprietary information of the business.
After consulting with the business, the Executive Director shall
determine whether to protect the information from disclosure. The
decision of the Executive Director is final and is not subject to
judicial review. If the Executive Director determines to protect the
information from disclosure, the protected information:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record;
(c) Must be redacted by the Executive Director from any audit
report that is disclosed to the public; and
(d) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or
employee of the Office of Economic Development unless the
business consents to the disclosure.
Sec. 4. NRS 360.757 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.757 1. The Office of Economic Development shall not
take any action on an application for any abatement of taxes
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 or section 1 of this act or any other specific statute unless
the Office:
(a) Takes that action at a public meeting conducted for that
purpose; and
(b) At least 30 days before the meeting, provides notice of the
application to:
(1) The governing body of the county, the board of trustees
of the school district and the governing body of the city or town, if
any, in which the pertinent business is or will be located;
(2) The governing body of any other political subdivision
that could be affected by the abatement; and
(3) The general public.
2. The notice required by this section must set forth the date,
time and location of the meeting at which the Office of Economic
Development will consider the application.
3. The Office of Economic Development shall adopt
regulations relating to the notice required by this section.
-
*SB364_R1*

– 9 –
Sec. 5. NRS 360.7575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7575 1. If the Office of Economic Development
approves an application for an abatement of sales and use taxes
pursuant to NRS 360.950 or a partial abatement of any sales and use
taxes pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753, 360.754 or 360.890, or section 1 of this act, the
Department shall issue to the business a document certifying the
abatement or partial abatement which can be presented to retailers at
the time of purchase. The document must clearly state that the
business is not required to pay sales and use taxes or the rate of sales
and use tax that the business is required to pay.
2. If the Department has issued to a business a document
pursuant to subsection 1 and the business pays an amount of sales
and use taxes for which the business was entitled to an abatement
because the business fails to present the document, the business may
apply to the Department for a refund of the amount of sales and use
tax paid for which the business was entitled to an abatement. If the
Department has issued to a business a document pursuant to
subsection 1 and the failure of the business to present the document
results in the business paying the full amount of sales and use tax on
50 percent or more of the purchases for which the business was
eligible for the abatement, the Department shall impose on the
business a penalty equal to 10 percent of the total amount of the
abatement. The Department shall distribute the proceeds of any
penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection to each local
government affected by a refund issued pursuant to this subsection
in proportion to the amount of the refunds for which the affected
local government is responsible.
3. If, after submitting an application for an abatement of sales
and use taxes pursuant to NRS 360.950 or a partial abatement of any
sales and use taxes pursuant to NRS 360.750, 360.753, 360.754 or
360.890 or section 1 of this act and before receiving the document
issued pursuant to subsection 1, a business pays an amount of sales
and use tax for which the business is entitled to an abatement, the
business may apply to the Department for a refund of the amount of
sales and use tax which the applicant paid for which the business is
entitled to an abatement.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no interest is
allowed on a refund made pursuant to subsection 2 or 3.
Sec. 6. NRS 218D.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.355 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.753,
360.754, 360.893 and 360.965, and section 1 of this act, any state
legislation enacted on or after July 1, 2012, which authorizes or
requires the Office of Economic Development to approve any
-
*SB364_R1*

– 10 –
abatement of taxes or increases the amount of any abatement of
taxes which the Office is authorized or required to approve:
(a) Expires by limitation 10 years after the effective date of that
legislation.
(b) Does not apply to:
(1) Any taxes imposed pursuant to NRS 374.110 and
374.111 or 374.190 and 374.191; or
(2) Any entity that receives:
(I) Any funding from a governmental entity, other than
any private activity bonds as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 141; or
(II) Any real or personal property from a governmental
entity at no cost or at a reduced cost.
(c) Requires each recipient of the abatement to submit to the
Department of Taxation, on or before the last day of each even-
numbered year, a report on whether the recipient is in compliance
with the terms of the abatement. The Department of Taxation shall
establish a form for the report and may adopt such regulations as it
determines to be appropriate to carry out this paragraph. The report
must include, without limitation:
(1) The date the recipient commenced operation in this State;
(2) The number of employees actually employed by the
recipient and the average hourly wage of those employees;
(3) An accounting of any fees paid by the recipient to the
State and to local governmental entities;
(4) An accounting of the property taxes paid by the recipient
and the amount of those taxes that would have been due if not for
the abatement;
(5) An accounting of the sales and use taxes paid by the
recipient and the amount of those taxes that would have been due if
not for the abatement;
(6) An accounting of the total capital investment made in
connection with the project to which the abatement applies; and
(7) An accounting of the total investment in personal
property made in connection with the project to which the
abatement applies.
2. On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
Department of Taxation shall:
(a) Based upon the information submitted to the Department of
Taxation pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1, prepare a written
report of its findings regarding whether the costs of the abatement
exceed the benefits of the abatement; and
(b) Submit the report to the Director for transmittal to the
Legislature.
-
*SB364_R1*

– 11 –
Sec. 7. NRS 231.0685 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.0685 The Office shall, on or before January 15 of each
odd-numbered year, prepare and submit to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature a
report concerning the abatements from taxation that the Office
approved pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753 or 360.754 [.] or section 1 of this act. The report must set
forth, for each abatement from taxation that the Office approved
during the fiscal years which are 3 fiscal years and 6 fiscal years
immediately preceding the submission of the report:
1. The dollar amount of the abatement;
2. The location of the business for which the abatement was
approved;
3. The value of infrastructure included as an incentive for the
business;
4. If applicable, the number of employees that the business for
which the abatement was approved employs or will employ;
5. Whether the business for which the abatement was approved
is a new business or an existing business;
6. The economic sector in which the business operates, the
number of primary jobs related to the business, the average wage
paid to employees of the business and the assessed values of
personal property and real property of the business;
7. Any information concerning whether the business for which
the abatement was approved participates or has participated in a
program of workforce development, as defined in NRS 231.146,
implemented by the Executive Director; and
8. Any other information that the Office determines to be
useful.
Sec. 8. NRS 231A.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231A.155 1. For the purposes of NRS 231A.0753, an impact
qualified active low-income community business is limited to those
businesses which have their principal business operations in this
State and:
(a) Whose primary North American Industry Classification
System classification is within sector 31, 32 or 33 or sector 44 or 45;
or
(b) Are businesses that have 51 percent or more of its ownership
interest held by women, disabled veterans, persons who are lesbian,
gay, bisexual or transgender or members of a racial or ethnic
minority group.
2. A business must be considered an impact qualified active
low-income community business for the duration of the impact
qualified community development entity’s investment in, or loan to,
the business if the entity reasonably expects, at the time it makes the
-
*SB364_R1*

– 12 –
investment or loan, that the business will continue to satisfy the
requirements for being an impact qualified active low-income
community business throughout the entire period of the investment
or loan.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
businesses limited by this section do not include any business that
derives or projects to derive 15 percent or more of its annual
revenue from the rental or sale of real estate. This exclusion does
not apply to a business that is controlled by, or under common
control with, another business if the second business:
(a) Does not derive or project to derive 15 percent or more of its
annual revenue from the rental or sale of real estate; and
(b) Is the primary tenant of the real estate leased from the first
business.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the following
businesses are not impact qualified active low-income community
businesses:
(a) A business that has received an abatement from taxation
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 [.] or section 1 of this act.
(b) An entity that has liability for insurance premium tax on a
premium tax report filed pursuant to NRS 680B.030.
(c) A business engaged in banking or lending.
(d) A massage parlor.
(e) A bath house.
(f) A tanning salon.
(g) A country club.
(h) A business operating under a nonrestricted license for
gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170.
(i) A liquor store.
(j) A golf course.
5. A business that has received an abatement from taxation
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 or section 1 of this act is an impact qualified active low-
income community business if the business elects to waive the
abatement and provides written notice of the waiver of the
abatement to the Office of Economic Development not later than
the due date of the first payment of any tax which would be abated
if the abatement became effective. If the business provides the
written notice to the Office of Economic Development:
(a) Within the period required by this subsection:
(1) Any agreement entered into by the business and the
Office of Economic Development pursuant to NRS 274.310,
274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or 360.754 or section 1 of this
act is void; and
-
*SB364_R1*

– 13 –
(2) The Office of Economic Development must forward a
copy of the written notice to the Department and each governmental
entity or official to whom a copy of the certificate of eligibility for
the abatement was forwarded.
(b) After the period required by this subsection has expired, the
Office of Economic Development must provide written notice to the
Department and the business that the abatement has not been waived
and the business is not an impact qualified active low-income
community business.
Sec. 9. NRS 231A.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231A.170 1. For the purpose of NRS 231A.110, a qualified
active low-income community business is limited to those
businesses meeting the Small Business Administration size
eligibility standards established in 13 C.F.R. §§ 121.101 to 201,
inclusive, at the time the qualified low-income community
investment is made. A business must be considered a qualified
active low-income community business for the duration of the
qualified community development entity’s investment in, or loan to,
the business if the entity reasonably expects, at the time it makes the
investment or loan, that the business will continue to satisfy the
requirements for being a qualified active low-income community
business, other than the Small Business Administration size
standards, throughout the entire period of the investment or loan.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
businesses limited by this section do not include any business that
derives or projects to derive 15 percent or more of its annual
revenue from the rental or sale of real estate. This exclusion does
not apply to a business that is controlled by, or under common
control with, another business if the second business:
(a) Does not derive or project to derive 15 percent or more of its
annual revenue from the rental or sale of real estate; and
(b) Is the primary tenant of the real estate leased from the first
business.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the following
businesses are not qualified active low-income community
businesses:
(a) A business that has received an abatement from taxation
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 [.] or section 1 of this act.
(b) An entity that has liability for insurance premium tax on a
premium tax report filed pursuant to NRS 680B.030.
(c) A business engaged in banking or lending.
(d) A massage parlor.
(e) A bath house.
(f) A tanning salon.
-
*SB364_R1*

– 14 –
(g) A country club.
(h) A business operating under a nonrestricted license for
gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170.
(i) A liquor store.
(j) A golf course.
4. A business that has received an abatement from taxation
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 or section 1 of this act is a qualified active low-income
community business if the business elects to waive the abatement
and provides written notice of the waiver of the abatement to the
Office of Economic Development not later than the due date of the
first payment of any tax which would be abated if the abatement
became effective. If the business provides the written notice to the
Office of Economic Development:
(a) Within the period required by this subsection:
(1) Any agreement entered into by the business and the
Office of Economic Development pursuant to NRS 274.310,
274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or 360.754 or section 1 of this
act is void; and
(2) The Office of Economic Development must forward a
copy of the written notice to the Department and each governmental
entity or official to whom a copy of the certificate of eligibility for
the abatement was forwarded.
(b) After the period required by this subsection has expired, the
Office of Economic Development must provide written notice to the
Department and the business that the abatement has not been waived
and the business is not a qualified active low-income community
business.
Sec. 10. NRS 353.207 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.207 1. The Chief shall:
(a) Require the Office of Economic Development and the Office
of Energy each periodically to conduct an analysis of the relative
costs and benefits of each incentive for economic development
previously approved by the respective office and in effect during the
immediately preceding 2 fiscal years, including, without limitation,
any abatement of taxes approved by the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753, 360.754, 360.890, 360.950, 361.0687, 374.357 or
701A.210, or section 1 of this act, to assist the Governor and the
Legislature in determining whether the economic benefits of the
incentive have accomplished the purposes of the statute pursuant to
which the incentive was approved and warrant additional incentives
of that kind;
-
*SB364_R1*

– 15 –
(b) Require each office to report in writing to the Chief the
results of the analysis conducted by the office pursuant to paragraph
(a); and
(c) Establish a schedule for performing and reporting the results
of the analysis required by paragraph (a) which ensures that the
results of the analysis reported by each office are included in the
proposed budget prepared pursuant to NRS 353.205, as required by
that section.
2. Each report prepared for the Chief pursuant to this section is
a public record and is open to inspection pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 239.010.
Sec. 11. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 12. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 11, inclusive, of this act become effective upon
passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any regulations
and performing any other preparatory administrative tasks that are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this act, and on July 1, 2025,
for all other purposes, and expire by limitation on June 30, 2045.
H
-
*SB364_R1*